Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB719.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$97,605,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account
established by KRS 48.705 to the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky (SEEK)
Program budget unit to provide financial assistance to local school districts for
employment of school counselors pursuant to KRS 158.4416(3)(a)1. The Kentucky
Department of Education shall reimburse local school districts for the salary of one
school counselor in each public school or public charter school. Included in the
appropriation are sufficient funds to enable local school districts to provide the employer
match to the Teachers' Retirement System. If the appropriation contained in this section
is insufficient for reimbursement to local school districts for the salary of one school
counselor at each public school or public charter school, the Kentucky Department of
Education is authorized to pro rata reduce the reimbursement to each school district. The
Kentucky Department of Education shall develop policies for the reimbursement to local
school districts for the purposes detailed in this Act.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:39 AM Jacketed